California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
In any judgment, interest shall be allowed at the modified adjusted rate per annum established for overpayments pursuant to Section 6591.5, upon the amount found to have been illegally collected from the date of payment of the amount to the date of allowance of credit on account of the judgment, or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55248.

A judgment shall not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any action brought against the board to recover any fee paid when the action is brought by or in the name of an assignee of the feepayer paying the fee or by any person other than the person who has paid the fee.

As used in this section, “assignee” does not include a person who has acquired the business of the feepayer which gave rise to the fee and who is thereby a successor in interest to the feepayer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Recover of Erroneous Refunds [55261. - 55263.]

55261.

(a) The Controller may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed, in an action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento in the name of the people of the State of California.

(b) As an alternative to subdivision (a), the board may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed. In recovering
 any erroneous refund or credit, the board may, in its discretion, issue a deficiency determination in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 55061) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 55101) of Chapter 3. Except in the case of fraud, the deficiency determination shall be made by the board within three years from the date of the Controller’s warrant or date of credit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

55262.

In any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 55261, the court may, with the consent of the Attorney General, order a change in the place of trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

55262.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if the department finds that neither the person liable for payment of fees nor any party related to that person has in any way caused an erroneous refund for which an action for recovery is provided under Section 55261, no interest shall be imposed on the amount of that erroneous refund until 30 days after the date on which the department serves a notice of determination for repayment of the erroneous refund to the person. The act of filing a claim for refund shall not be considered as causing the erroneous refund.

(b) This section shall be operative for any action for recovery under Section 55261 on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 117.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

55263.

The Attorney General shall prosecute any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 55263, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proof, trials, and appeals shall apply to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Cancellations [55281. - 55281.]

55281.

(a) If any amount has been illegally determined, either by the person filing the return or by the department, the department shall certify the amount determined to be in excess of the amount legally due and the person against whom the determination was made and authorize the cancellation of the amount upon the records of the department.

(b) Any determination by the department that is in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 106.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Administration and Taxpayers’ Bill of Rights [55301. - 55337.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [55301. - 55306.4.]

55301.

The board shall enforce this part and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55302.

The board may make examinations of the books and records of any feepayer as it may deem necessary in carrying out this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55303.

The board may employ accountants, auditors, investigators, and other expert and clerical assistance necessary to enforce its powers and perform its duties under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55304.

A certificate by the board or an employee of the board stating that a notice required by this part was given by mailing or personal service shall be prima facie evidence in any administrative or judicial proceeding of the fact and regularity of the mailing or personal service in accordance with any requirement of this part for the giving of a notice. Unless otherwise specifically required, any notice provided by this part to be mailed or served may be given either by mailing or by personal service in the manner provided for giving notice of a deficiency
 determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55305.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who is engaged in the business of preparing, or providing services in connection with the preparation of, returns under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 55041), or any person who for compensation prepares any such return for any other person, and who knowingly or recklessly does either of the following shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned no more than one year, or both, together with the
 costs of prosecution:

(1) Discloses any information furnished to him or her for, or in connection with, the preparation of the return.

(2) Uses that information for any purpose other than to prepare, or assist in preparing, the return.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to disclosure of information if that disclosure is made pursuant to the person’s consent or pursuant to a subpoena, court order, or other compulsory legal process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 94.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

55306.

(a) The board shall determine which feepayer’s accounts are eligible for the managed audit program in a manner that is consistent with the efficient use of its auditing resources and the maximum effectiveness of the program.

(b) A feepayer is not required to participate in the managed audit program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 51.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

55306.1.

A feepayer’s account is eligible for the managed audit program only if the feepayer meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The feepayer’s business or activities involve few or no statutory exemptions.

(b) The feepayer’s business or activities involve a single or a small number of clearly defined taxability or liability issues.

(c) The feepayer is liable for payment of a fee collected pursuant to this part and agrees to participate in the managed audit program.

(d) The feepayer has the resources to comply with the managed audit instructions provided by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 52.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

55306.2.

(a) If the board selects a feepayer’s account for a managed audit, all of the following apply:

(1) The board shall identify all of the following:

(A) The audit period covered by the managed audit.

(B) The types of transactions or activities covered by the managed
 audit.

(C) The specific procedures that the feepayer is to follow in determining any liability.

(D) The records to be reviewed by the feepayer.

(E) The manner in which the types of transactions or activities are to be scheduled for review.

(F) The time period for completion of the managed audit.

(G) The time period for the payment of the liability and interest.

(H) Any other criteria that the board may require for completion of the managed audit.

(2) The feepayer shall:

(A) Examine its books and
 records to determine if it has any unreported liability for the audit period.

(B) Make available to the board for verification all computations books and records examined pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(b) The information provided by the feepayer pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is the same information that is required for the completion of any other audit that the board may conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 53.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

55306.3.

Nothing in this article limits the board’s authority to examine the books and records of a feepayer under Section 55302.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 54.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

55306.4.

Upon completion of the managed audit and verification by the board, interest on any unpaid liability shall be computed at one-half the rate that would otherwise be imposed for liabilities covered by the audit period. Payment of the liabilities and interest shall be made within the time period specified by the board. If the requirements for the managed audit are not satisfied, the board may proceed to examine the records of the feepayer in a manner to be determined by the board
 under law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 55.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The California Taxpayers’ Bill of Rights [55321. - 55337.]

55321.

The board shall administer this article. Unless the context indicates otherwise, the provisions of this article shall apply to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55322.

(a) The board shall establish the position of the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate. The advocate or his or her designee shall be responsible for facilitating resolution of taxpayer complaints and problems, including any taxpayer complaints regarding unsatisfactory treatment of taxpayers by board employees, and staying actions where taxpayers have suffered or will suffer irreparable loss as the result of those actions. Applicable statutes of limitation shall be tolled during the pendency of a stay. Any penalties and interest that would otherwise
 accrue shall not be affected by the granting of a stay.

(b) The advocate shall report directly to the executive officer of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55323.

(a) The board shall develop and implement an education and information program directed at, but not limited to, all of the following groups:

(1) Taxpayers newly registered with the board.

(2) Board audit and compliance staff.

(b) The education and information program shall include all of the following:

(1) A program of written communication with newly registered taxpayers explaining in simplified terms their duties and responsibilities.

(2) Participation in seminars and similar programs organized by federal, state, and local agencies.

(3) Revision of taxpayer educational materials currently produced by the board that explain the most common areas of taxpayer nonconformance in simplified terms.

(4) Implementation of a continuing education program for audit and compliance personnel to include the application of new legislation to taxpayer activities and areas of recurrent taxpayer noncompliance of inconsistency of administration.

(c) Electronic media used pursuant to this section shall not
 represent the voice, picture, or name of members of the board or of the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

55324.

The board shall conduct an annual hearing before the full board where industry representatives and individual taxpayers are allowed to present their proposals on changes to the Fee Collection Procedures Law which may further improve voluntary compliance and the relationship between taxpayers and government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55325.

The board shall prepare and publish brief but comprehensive statements in simple and nontechnical language that explain procedure, remedies, and the rights and obligations of the board and taxpayers. As appropriate, statements shall be provided to taxpayers with the initial notice of audit, the notice of proposed additional taxes, any subsequent notice of tax due, or other substantive notices. Additionally, the board shall include this language for statements in the annual tax information bulletins that are mailed to taxpayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55326.

(a) The amount of revenue collected or assessed pursuant to this part shall not be used for any of the following:

(1) To evaluate individual officers or employees.

(2) To impose or suggest production quotas or goals.

(b) The board shall certify in its annual report submitted pursuant to Section 15616 of the Government Code that revenue collected or
 assessed is not used in a manner prohibited by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55327.

The board shall develop and implement a program that will evaluate an individual employee’s or officer’s performance with respect to his or her contact with taxpayers. The development and implementation of the program shall be coordinated with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55328.

The board shall, in cooperation with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate, and other interested taxpayer-oriented groups, develop a plan to reduce the time required to resolve petitions for redetermination and claims for refunds. The plan shall include determination of standard timeframes and special review of cases which take more time than the appropriate standard timeframe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55329.

Procedures of the board, relating to appeals staff review conferences before a staff attorney or supervising tax auditor independent of the assessing department, shall include all of the following:

(a) Any conference shall be held at a reasonable time at a board office that is convenient to the taxpayer.

(b) The conference may be recorded only if prior notice is given to the taxpayer and the taxpayer is entitled to receive a copy of
 the recording.

(c) The taxpayer shall be informed prior to any conference that he or she has a right to have present at the conference his or her attorney, accountant, or other designated agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55330.

(a) Every taxpayer is entitled to be reimbursed for any reasonable fees and expenses related to a hearing before the board if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The taxpayer files a claim for the fees and expenses with the board within one year of the date the decision of the board becomes final.

(2) The board, in its sole discretion, finds that the action taken by the board staff was
 unreasonable.

(3) The board decides that the taxpayer be awarded a specific amount of fees and expenses related to the hearing, in an amount determined by the board in its sole discretion.

(b) To determine whether the board staff has been unreasonable, the board shall consider whether the board staff has established that its position was substantially justified.

(c) The amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to the following:

(1) Fees and expenses incurred after the date of the notice of determination, jeopardy determination, or a claim for refund.

(2) If the board finds that the staff was unreasonable with respect to certain issues but reasonable with respect to other
 issues, the amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to those that relate to the issues where the staff was found unreasonable.

(d) Any proposed award by the board pursuant to this section shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the award.

(e) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for claims filed on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 95.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

55331.

(a) An officer or employee of the board acting in connection with any law administered by the board shall not knowingly authorize, require, or conduct any investigation of, or surveillance over, any person for nontax administration related purposes.

(b) Any person violating subdivision (a) shall be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, including dismissal from office or discharge from employment.

(c) This section shall not apply with respect to any otherwise lawful investigation concerning organized crime activities.

(d) The provisions of this section are not intended to prohibit, restrict, or prevent the exchange of information where the person is being investigated for multiple violations which include hazardous substances tax violations.

(e) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Investigation” means any oral or written inquiry directed to any person, organization, or governmental agency.

(2) “Surveillance” means the monitoring of persons, places, or events by means of electronic interception, overt or covert observations, or photography, and the use of
 informants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55332.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department, its staff, and the Attorney General pursue settlements as authorized under this section with respect to fee matters in dispute that are the subject of protests, appeals, or refund claims, consistent with a reasonable evaluation of the costs and risks associated with litigation of these matters.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no recommendation of settlement shall be submitted to the director for approval unless and until that recommendation has been submitted by the chief counsel to the Attorney General. Within 30 days of receiving that recommendation,
 the Attorney General shall review the recommendation and advise the chief counsel, in writing, of their conclusions as to whether the recommendation is reasonable from an overall perspective. The chief counsel shall, with each recommendation of settlement submitted to the director, also submit the Attorney General’s written conclusions obtained pursuant to this paragraph.

(2) (A) A settlement of any civil fee matter in dispute involving a reduction of fee or penalties in settlement, the total of which reduction of fee and penalties in settlement does not exceed
 eleven thousand five hundred dollars ($11,500), may be approved by the director.

(B) Beginning on July 1, 2029, and each fifth fiscal year thereafter, the department shall adjust the amount specified in subparagraph (A) by increasing that amount by a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the Department of Finance with the resulting amount rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100). The first adjustment pursuant to this subparagraph shall be a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index from January 1, 2024, to January 1, 2029. Subsequent fifth fiscal year adjustments shall cover subsequent five-year periods. The incremental change shall be added to the previously adjusted amount.

(c) Whenever a reduction of fees, or penalties, or total fees and penalties in settlement in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved pursuant to this section, there shall be placed on file, for at least one year, in the office of the director of the department a public record with respect to that settlement. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name or names of the feepayers who are parties to the settlement.

(2) The total amount in dispute.

(3) The amount agreed to pursuant to the settlement.

(4) A summary of the reasons why the settlement is in the best interests of the State of California.

(5) (A) For any settlement approved by the
 director, except those settlements approved pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the Attorney General’s conclusion as to whether the recommendation of settlement was reasonable from an overall perspective.

(B) The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secret, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure that, if disclosed, would adversely affect the feepayer or the national defense.

(d) The director shall not participate in the settlement of fee matters pursuant to this section, except as provided
 in subdivision (e).

(e) (1) Any recommendation for settlement shall be approved or disapproved by the director within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation to the director. Any recommendation for settlement that is not either approved or disapproved by the director within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation shall be deemed approved.

(2) Where the director disapproves a recommendation for settlement, at the discretion of the director and chief counsel, the matter shall be remanded to staff for further negotiation, and may be resubmitted to the director, in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as the initial
 submission.

(f) All settlements entered into pursuant to this section shall be final and nonappealable, except upon a showing of fraud or misrepresentation with respect to a material fact.

(g) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any settlement considered or entered into pursuant to this section shall constitute confidential information for purposes of Section 55381.

(h) The Legislature finds that it is essential for fiscal purposes that the settlement program authorized by this section be expeditiously implemented. Accordingly, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any determination, rule, notice, or
 guideline established or issued by the department in implementing and administering the settlement program authorized by this section.

(i) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to any settlements approved on or after January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 37.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

55332.5.

(a) Beginning on January 1, 2007, the director of the department, or their delegates, may compromise any final fee liability.

(b) For purposes of this section, “a final fee liability” means any final fee liability arising under Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001), or related interest, additions to fees, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part.

(c) (1) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated from a business that has been discontinued or transferred, where the feepayer making the offer no longer has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business or has a controlling interest or association with a
 similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued business.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a qualified final fee liability may be compromised regardless of whether the business has been discontinued or transferred or whether the feepayer has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued business. All other provisions of this section that apply to a final fee liability shall also apply to a qualified final fee liability, and a compromise shall not be made under this subdivision unless all other requirements of this section are met. For purposes of this subdivision, a “qualified final fee liability” means that part of a final fee liability, including related interest, additions to fees, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part, arising from a transaction or transactions in which the department finds no evidence that the feepayer collected the fee from the
 purchaser or other person and which was determined against the feepayer under Article 2 (commencing with Section 55061) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 55081) of Chapter 3.

(3) A qualified final fee liability may not be compromised with any of the following:

(A) A feepayer who previously received a compromise under paragraph (2) for a liability, or a part thereof, arising from a transaction or transactions that are substantially similar to the transaction or transactions attributable to the liability for which the feepayer is making the offer.

(B) A business that was transferred by a feepayer who previously received a compromise under paragraph (2) and who has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business, when the liability for which the offer is made is attributable to a transaction or
 transactions substantially similar to the transaction or transactions for which the feepayer’s liability was previously compromised.

(C) A business in which a feepayer who previously received a compromise under paragraph (2) has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business for which the feepayer received the compromise, when the liability of the business making the offer arose from a transaction or transactions substantially similar to the transaction or transactions for which the feepayer’s liability was previously compromised.

(d) The department may, in its discretion, enter into a written agreement that permits the feepayer to pay the compromise in installments for a period not exceeding one year. The agreement may provide that such installments shall be paid by electronic funds transfers or any other means to facilitate the payment of each
 installment.

(e) A feepayer that has received a compromise under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) may be required to enter into any collateral agreement that is deemed necessary for the protection of the interests of the state. A collateral agreement may include a provision that allows the department to reestablish the liability, or any portion thereof, if the feepayer has sufficient annual income during the succeeding five-year period. The department shall establish criteria for determining “sufficient annual income” for purposes of this subdivision.

(f) A feepayer that has received a compromise under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall file and pay by the due date all subsequently required returns for a five-year period from the date the liability is compromised, or until the feepayer is no longer required to file returns, whichever period is earlier.

(g) Offers in compromise shall not be considered where the feepayer has been convicted of felony tax evasion under this part during the liability period.

(h) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The feepayer shall establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the feepayer’s present assets or income.

(B) The feepayer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the feepayer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The department shall have determined that acceptance of the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

(i) A determination by the department that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final fee liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(j) (1) Offers for liabilities with a fraud or evasion penalty shall require a minimum offer of the unpaid fee and fraud or evasion penalty.

(2) The minimum offer may be waived if it can be shown that the feepayer making the offer was not the person responsible for perpetrating the fraud or evasion. This authorization to waive only applies to partnership accounts where the intent to commit fraud or
 evasion can be clearly attributed to a partner of the feepayer.

(k) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the department shall notify the feepayer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the feepayer.

(l) When more than one feepayer is liable for the debt, such as with spouses or partnerships or other business combinations, including, but not limited to, feepayers who are liable through dual determination or successor’s liability, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable feepayer shall reduce the amount of the liability of the other feepayers by the amount of the accepted offer.

(m) Whenever a compromise of fees or
 penalties or total fees and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the director of the department a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the feepayer.

(2) The amount of unpaid fees and related penalties, additions to fees, interest, or other amounts involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational
 structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the feepayer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Section 55381. A list shall not be prepared and releases shall not be distributed by the department in connection with these statements.

(n) A compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be reestablished, without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable, and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The department determines that a person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the department property belonging to the estate of a feepayer or other person liable for the fee.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified a book, document, or record or made a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the feepayer or other person liable for the fee.

(2) The feepayer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(o) A person who, in connection with an offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from an officer or employee of this state property belonging to
 the estate of a feepayer or other person liable in respect of the fee.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies a book, document, or record, or makes a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the feepayer or other person liable in respect of the fee.

(p) For purposes of this section, “person” means the feepayer, a member of the feepayer’s family, a corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or another individual or entity acting on behalf of, the feepayer, or another corporation or entity owned or controlled by the feepayer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the feepayer, directly or indirectly.

(q) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 272, Sec. 15) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 107.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec.108 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 474.)
-------------------------------------------

55332.5.

(a) The director of the department, or their delegates, may compromise any final fee liability.

(b) For purposes of this section, “a final fee liability” means any final fee liability arising under Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001), or related interest, additions to fees, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part.

(c) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated from a business that has been discontinued or transferred, where the feepayer making the offer no longer has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business or has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued
 business.

(d) Offers in compromise shall not be considered where the feepayer has been convicted of felony tax evasion under this part during the liability period.

(e) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The feepayer shall establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the feepayer’s present assets or income.

(B) The feepayer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the feepayer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The department shall have determined that acceptance of the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

(f) A determination by the department that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final fee liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(g) (1) Offers for liabilities with a fraud or evasion penalty shall require a minimum offer of the unpaid fee and fraud or evasion penalty.

(2) The minimum offer may be waived if it can be shown that the feepayer making the offer was not the person responsible for perpetrating the fraud or evasion. This authorization to waive only applies to partnership accounts where the intent to commit fraud
 or evasion can be clearly attributed to a partner of the feepayer.

(h) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the department shall notify the feepayer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the feepayer.

(i) When more than one feepayer is liable for the debt, such as with spouses or partnerships or other business combinations, including, but not limited to, feepayers who are liable through dual determination or successor’s liability, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable feepayer shall reduce the amount of the liability of the other feepayers by the amount of the accepted offer.

(j) Whenever a compromise of fees
 or penalties or total fees and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the director of the department a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the feepayer.

(2) The amount of unpaid fees and related penalties, additions to fees, interest, or other amounts involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or
 organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the feepayer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Section 55381. A list shall not be prepared and releases shall not be distributed by the department in connection with these statements.

(k) A compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be reestablished, without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable, and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The department determines that a person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the department property belonging to the estate of a feepayer or other person liable for the fee.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified a book, document, or record, or made any false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the feepayer or other person liable for the fee.

(2) The feepayer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(l) A person who, in connection with an offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from an officer or employee of this state property belonging
 to the estate of a feepayer or other person liable in respect of the fee.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies a book, document, or record, or makes a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the feepayer or other person liable in respect of the fee.
